Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-550
Shipments; failure to weigh; penalty.

Any railroad operating in this state and violating any of the provisions of sections 74-548 and 74-549 by neglecting or refusing to furnish weights as provided in section 74-549 shall upon conviction thereof be fined in the sum of one hundred dollars for each and every such violation. The fine shall be recovered by the state in an action in its name upon complaint of any owner, consignor, or consignee of the property which such railroad refuses to weigh, made before any court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1907, c. 88, § 5, p. 308;

R.S.1913, § 6009;

C.S.1922, § 5354;

C.S.1929, § 74-537;

R.S.1943, § 74-550;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 7.